Utah statutes.
63B-11-112.   Refunding of bonds.
(1)  The commission may provide for the refunding of any of the bonds in
accordance with Title 11, Chapter 27, Utah Refunding Bond Act.
(2)  For purposes of Title 11, Chapter 27, Utah Refunding Bond Act, the state
is considered the public body and the commission its governing body.
